Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-373
Capital stock association; articles of incorporation; application; file information with department; examination fee.

A copy of the articles of incorporation and bylaws of every association applying under section 8-372 shall be filed with the department together with an application for a certificate of approval and payment of the examination fee prescribed by section 8-602. The application shall furnish and set forth information as may be required by the department's rules and regulations and the information required by sections 8-356 to 8-384.

Laws 1981, LB 500, § 18;

Laws 2003, LB 217, § 12.